Montana, session 2025, SB566.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Definitions. For the purposes of [sections 1 through 3], the following
definitions apply:
(1) "Chemical restraint" means the use of a drug or medication to control behavior or restrict the
program participant's freedom of movement that is not a standard treatment for the program participant's
medical or psychiatric condition.
(2) "Physical restraint" means a personal restriction that immobilizes or reduces the ability of the
free movement of an individual's arms, legs, or head.
(3) (a) "Secure youth transportation company" means a private business or nonprofit that
specializes in the transport of children.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 566

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 566.1
(b) The term does not include the transport of a child by a law enforcement officer, department
employee, or other public employee in the course of that officer or employee's official duties.
(4) "Visually impair" means the use of an item that limits or impairs the vision of a person, such as
a hood or blindfold.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Secure youth transportation company -- registration -- duties of
department. (1) (a) A secure youth transportation company shall register with the department of public health
and human services annually and shall pay an annual fee prescribed by the department.
(b) The department shall provide a form for the registration of a secure youth transportation
company that includes:
(i) the name of the company;
(ii) the name of each owner of the company;
(iii) each state in which the company is registered as a business and its business license number
or equivalent identifier in each state;
(iv) the license plate number of each vehicle used by the company to transport youth and the state
where each vehicle is registered;
(v) a notice that secure youth transport providers are required to comply with the provisions of
[sections 1 through 3]; and
(vi) any additional information required by the department to protect the welfare and safety of
children and to prevent human trafficking.
(2) The department shall publish a list of registered secure youth transport providers publicly on its
website and update the list at least once each quarter.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Human trafficking prevention -- child welfare protection -- duties of
secure youth transportation company -- duties of department of public health and human services. (1) A
minimum of 48 hours before a transport occurs, a secure youth transportation company shall notify the
department of public health and human services on an electronic form prescribed by the department that the
company intends to transport a child to a location in the state or that it is transporting a child through the state.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 566

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 566.1
The electronic form must include:
(a) the name, age, and birth date of the child who is the subject of the transport;
(b) the name and contact information for the child's parent or guardian;
(c) the name of the secure youth transportation company;
(d) the first and last name of each employee of the secure youth transportation company involved
in the transport;
(e) where the company will pick up and leave the child; and
(f) any additional information required by the department to prevent human trafficking and to
protect the safety and welfare of the child who is the subject of the transport.
(2) (a) The department of public health and human services shall maintain a record of a notification
required under subsection (1) for a minimum of 10 years.
(b) The department shall grant the department of justice access to all records of notifications
required under subsection (1) for the purpose of investigating and prosecuting human trafficking cases.
(c) The department shall grant a person access to a record of a notification required under
subsection (1) if the person was the subject of the transport.
(3) A secure youth transportation company shall tell the child the name of the company and the
first and last name of each employee involved in the transport.
(4) A secure youth transportation company may not:
(a) use a physical restraint or a chemical restraint or visually impair a child; and
(b) pick up a child for transport between the hours of 9 p.m. and 6 a.m.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 3] are intended to be
codified as an integral part of Title 52, chapter 2, and the provisions of Title 52, chapter 2, apply to [sections 1
through 3].
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 566